Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
State Employee Workers’ Compensation

18A.370.
Definitions for KRS 18A.375 to 18A.385 — Applicability of KRS 64.368 if population decreases below 70,000.

For the purposes of KRS

18A.375

to

18A.385

, the term “state employee” shall mean all persons, including elected public officials, who are regularly employed by the executive, judicial, and legislative departments of government, except employees of the Transportation Cabinet and the University of Kentucky who have their own self-insurance fund. The term “state employee” shall also include volunteer firefighters and volunteer ambulance personnel; persons who are regularly employed by the Fayette County Health Department; and persons who are regularly employed by court clerks and sheriffs of counties with a population of seventy thousand (70,000) or more. If a county’s population that equaled or exceeded seventy thousand (70,000) is less than seventy thousand (70,000) after the most recent federal decennial census, then the provisions of KRS

64.368

shall apply.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 490, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; Acts 1992, ch. 220, § 2, effective January 1, 1994; 2002, ch. 71, § 9, effective July 15, 2002.

18A.375.
State employee workers’ compensation fund.

There is hereby established a state employee workers’ compensation fund which shall be administered by the Personnel Cabinet’s Office of Employee Relations. The purpose of this fund shall be to self-insure workers’ compensation benefits for state employees.

All moneys contributed by participants of the fund, or derived from federal funds, shall be credited to and constitute a part of the state employee workers’ compensation fund.

The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, may invest the state employee benefit workers’ compensation fund. Any income derived from these investments, or dividends, shall be credited to and become a part of the general fund. Any moneys remaining in the fund after all claims, premiums or subscription charges, and other expenses have been paid, shall be retained in the fund. All moneys remaining in the state employee workers’ compensation fund on July 1, or deposited thereafter, shall be deemed a trust and agency account and shall not lapse, but shall be continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in KRS

18A.375

to

18A.385

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 490, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 116, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 154, § 52, effective July 15, 1998; 2012, ch. 10, § 6, effective July 12, 2012.

18A.380.
Administrative regulations.

The Personnel Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary for the administration of the state employee workers’ compensation fund established by KRS

18A.375

, the actuarial soundness of the fund, the integrity of the fund, the purchase of reinsurance or excess insurance, and the expenditure of moneys from the fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 490, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 53, effective July 15, 1998.

18A.385.
Actuarial analysis of fund.

At least every two (2) years, the Personnel Cabinet shall have an actuary familiar with workers’ compensation insurance prepare an actuarial analysis of the state employee workers’ compensation fund established by KRS

18A.375

and make any recommendation that he deems appropriate. The department may, at any time, request an actuary to evaluate the adequacy of the rates of contribution. These rates may be adjusted if the adjustment is recommended by the actuary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 490, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 154, § 54, effective July 15, 1998.